test/src/gt-desc-yamls/mesun_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - mesun - ok : # test for verb inflection of verb mesun
    mesun+V+INF: mesun
    mesun+V+Pst+SetA.Sg1: xinmesun
    mesun+V+Pst+SetA.Pl1: xoomesun
    mesun+V+Pst+SetA.Sg2: xatmesun
    mesun+V+Pst+SetA.Pl2: xexmesun
    mesun+V+Pst+SetA.Sg3: xmesun
    mesun+V+Pst+SetA.Pl3: xe'mesun

    mesun+V+NarPst+SetA.Sg1: kinmesun
    mesun+V+NarPst+SetA.Pl1: koomesun
    mesun+V+NarPst+SetA.Sg2: katmesun
    mesun+V+NarPst+SetA.Pl2: kexmesun
    mesun+V+NarPst+SetA.Sg3: kmesun  # TODO kimesun?
    mesun+V+NarPst+SetA.Pl3: ke'mesun

    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Sg1: ninmesun
    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Pl1: naqamesun
    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Sg2: nakamesun
    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Pl2: nekemesun
    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Sg3: naxmesun
    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Pl3: neke'xmesun

    mesun+V+Fut+SetA.Sg1: tinmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetA.Pl1: toomesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetA.Sg2: tatmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetA.Pl2: texmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetA.Sg3: tmesun  # TODO taamesun?
    mesun+V+Fut+SetA.Pl3: te'mesun

    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg1: tatinmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg1: tinmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg1: texinmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg1: tinmesuneb'
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg1: tinmesun

    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl1: tatoomesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl1: toomesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl1: textoomesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl1: toomesuneb'
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl1: toomesun

    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg2: tinatmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg2: tatmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg2: too'atmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg2: texinmesuneb'
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg2: texinmesun

    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl2: texmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl2: texmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl2: texmesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl2: texmesun

    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg3: tmesun  # TODO taamesun?
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg3: tmesun  # TODO taamesun?
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg3: tmesun  # TODO taamesun?
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg3: tmesun  # TODO taamesun?

    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl3: te'mesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl3: te'mesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl3: te'mesun
    mesun+V+Fut+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl3: te'mesun

    mesun+V+Prs+SetA.Sg1: tinmesun
